Hawaii statutes.
§832-18 Forfeiture of bail. If the
prisoner is admitted to bail, and fails to appear and surrender oneself
according to the conditions of the prisoner's bond, the judge, by proper order,
shall declare the bond forfeited and order the prisoner's immediate arrest
without warrant if the prisoner be within this State. Recovery may be had on
the bond in the name of the State as in the case of other bonds given by the
accused in criminal proceedings within this State. [L 1941, c 99, §18; RL 1945,
§10648; RL 1955, §250-18; HRS §713-18; am L 1970, c 188, §39; ren L 1972, c 9,
pt of §1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next